Tennessee, session 114, SB1854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-149, is amended by deleting
"one hundred (100) years" wherever it appears and substituting "ninety (90) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1854
010766
- 1 -